Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.120

Registration—Fee—Requirements.

The secretary may issue a registration to an applicant who submits, on forms provided by the department, the applicant's name, the address, occupational title, name and location of business where applicant performs his or her services, and other information as determined by the secretary, including information necessary to determine whether there are grounds for denial of registration under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall pay a fee as determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary shall establish the administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for registration and for renewal of registrations as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 73; 1991 c 222 s 4.]